Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Chapter 66. Domestic Violence and Sexual Assault.

Cross references. —

For other provisions related to domestic violence, see AS

18.65.510

—

18.65.590

.

Administrative Code. —

For council on domestic violence and sexual assault, see 13 AAC, part 7.

Legislative history reports. —

Many of the provisions of this chapter added by ch. 64, SLA 1996 were derived from HB 454 of the Nineteenth Alaska State Legislature; for the Governor’s transmittal letter for HB 454, see 1996 House Journal 2546.

Collateral references. —

41 Am. Jur. 2d, Husband and Wife, § 5, 9.

42 Am. Jur. 2d, Injunctions, §§ 26 — 48.

41 C.J.S., Husband and Wife, § 202.

43A C.J.S., Injunctions, §§ 36 — 41, 254, 260.

Criminal responsibility of husband for rape, or assault to commit rape, on wife. 24 ALR4th 105.

Ineffective assistance of counsel: Battered spouse syndrome as defense to homicide or other criminal offense. 11 ALR5th 871.

Admissibility of evidence of prior physical acts of spousal abuse committed by defendant accused of murdering spouse or former spouse. 24 ALR5th 465.

Admissibility of expert or opinion evidence of battered-woman syndrome on issue of self-defense. 58 ALR5th 749.